Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article IV Protection of Purchasers

34-41-4.01.
Applicability — Exemptions.

This Article applies to all time shares subject to this chapter except as provided in subsection (b).

Neither a public offering statement nor the materials required by § 34-41-4.07 (Resale of Time Shares) need be prepared or delivered in the case of:

A gratuitous disposition of a time share;

A disposition pursuant to court order;

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

A disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition that may be canceled at any time and for any reason by the purchaser without penalty;

A disposition of a time share in a unit situated wholly outside this state pursuant to a contract executed wholly outside this state, if there has been no offering within this state;

An offering by a developer of time shares in no more than one time-share unit at any one time; or

A disposition of a time-share property or all time shares therein to one purchaser.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.02.
Liability for public offering statement requirements.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a developer, prior to the offering of any interest in a unit to the public, shall prepare a public offering statement conforming to the requirements of §§

34-41-4.03

,

34-41-4.04

and

34-41-4.05

.

A developer may transfer responsibility for preparation of all or a part of the public offering statement to a successor developer (§

34-41-3.04

) or to a person in the business of selling real estate who intends to offer time shares in the time-share property for his or her own account. In the event of any such transfer, the transferor shall provide the transferee with any information necessary to enable the transferee to fulfill the requirements of subsection (a).

Any developer or other person in the business of selling real estate who offers a time share for his or her own account to a purchaser shall deliver a public offering statement in the manner prescribed in §

34-41-4.06(a)

. The person who prepared all or a part of the public offering statement is liable under §§

34-41-4.06

,

34-41-4.15

,

34-41-5.05

and

34-41-5.06

for any false or misleading statement set forth therein or for any omission of material fact therefrom with respect to that portion of the public offering statement which he or she prepared. If a developer did not prepare any part of a public offering statement that he or she delivers, he or she is not liable for any false or misleading statement set forth therein or for any omission of material fact therefrom unless he or she had actual knowledge of the statement or omission or, in the exercise of reasonable care, should have known of the statement or omission.

If a time-share property is part of any other real estate regime in connection with the sale of which the delivery of a public offering statement is required under the laws of this state, a single public offering statement conforming to the requirements of §§

34-41-4.03

,

34-41-4.04

and

34-41-4.05

as those requirements relate to all real estate regimes in which the time-share property is located, and to any other requirements imposed under the laws of this state, may be prepared and delivered in lieu of providing two (2) or more public offering statements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.03.
Public offering statement — General provisions.

A public offering statement must contain or fully and accurately disclose:

The name and principal address of the developer and the location of the time-share property;

A general description of the time-share property and the time-share units, including without limitation the number of units in the time-share property and in any project of which it is a part, and the schedule of commencement and completion of all improvements;

As to all units owned or offered by the developer in the same project:

The types and number of units;

Identification of units that are time-share units;

The types and durations of the time shares;

The maximum number of units that may become part of the time-share property; and

A statement of the maximum number of time shares that may be created or that there is no maximum;

Copies and a brief narrative description of the significant features of the time-share instrument and any documents referred to therein (other than any plats and plans), copies of any contracts or leases to be signed by purchasers at closing, and a brief narrative description of any contracts or leases that will or may be subject to cancellation by the owners of time-share estates under §

34-41-3.05

;

The identity of the managing entity and the manner, if any, whereby the developer may change the managing entity or its control;

A current balance sheet and a projected budget for the association, if there is an association, either within or as an exhibit to the public offering statement, for one year after the date of the first transfer to a purchaser, and thereafter the current budget, a statement of who prepared the budget, and a statement of the budgetary assumptions concerning occupancy and inflation factors. The budget must include, without limitation:

A statement of the amount, or a statement that there is no amount, included in the budget as a reserve for repairs and replacement;

A statement of any other reserves;

The projected time-share expense liability by category of expenditures for the time-share units; and

The projected time-share expense liability for each time share;

A description of (i) the nature and purposes of all charges, dues, maintenance fees, and other expenses that may be assessed, (ii) the current amounts assessed, and (iii) the method and formula for altering charges in the future;

Any services which the developer provides or expenses he or she pays and which he or she expects may become at any subsequent time a time-share expense of the time shares, and the projected time-share expense liability attributable to each of those services or expenses for each time share;

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose of the fee and the method of its calculation;

A statement of the effect on the time-share owners of liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the time-share units;

A description of any financing offered by the developer;

The terms and significant limitations of any warranties provided by the developer, including statutory warranties and limitations on the enforcement thereof or on damages;

A statement that:

Within three (3) days excluding Sundays and holidays after receipt of a public offering statement a purchaser, before transfer of title, may cancel any contract for purchase of a time share from a developer, by hand delivering notice thereof to the seller or by mailing notice thereof by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the developer or to his or her agent for service of process,

If a developer fails to provide a public offering statement to a purchaser before the transferring of title to a time share, the purchaser is entitled to recover from the developer ten percent (10%) of the sales price of the time share, and

If a purchaser receives the public offering statement more than three (3) days excluding Sundays and holidays before signing a contract, he or she cannot cancel the contract for failure timely to receive the public offering statement;

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against the developer or the managing entity, the status of any pending suits involving the sale or management of real estate to which the developer or an affiliate of the developer or the managing entity is a defending party, and the status of any pending suits of which the developer has actual knowledge, of significance to the time-share units;

A statement that any deposit made in connection with the purchase of a time share will be held in an escrow (or trust) account until expiration of the time for rescission or any later time specified in the contract to purchase the time share and will be returned to the purchaser if the purchaser cancels the contract pursuant to §

34-41-4.06

;

Any restraints on transfer of time shares or portions thereof;

A description of the insurance coverage provided for the benefit of time-share owners;

Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by time-share owners for the use of any facilities related to the project;

The extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of all promised improvements pursuant to §

34-41-4.17

(Developer’s Obligation to Complete);

The extent to which a time-share unit may become subject to a tax or other lien arising out of claims against other time-share owners of the same time-share unit;

A description of the rights and remedies provided in the time-share instrument of a time-share owner who is prevented from enjoying exclusive occupancy of a time-share unit, or a statement that there are none provided in the instrument; and

All unusual and material circumstances, features, and characteristics of the project.

As used in this subsection, “exchange company” means a person operating a program of the kind described in this subsection. If the time-share owners are to be permitted or required to become members of or to participate in a program for the exchange of occupancy rights among themselves or with the time-share owners of other time-share units or both, the public offering statement or a supplement delivered therewith must contain or fully and accurately disclose:

Whether membership or participation in the program by a time-share owner is voluntary or mandatory;

The name and address of the exchange company and whether the exchange company is an affiliate of the developer; or whether the exchange company or any of its officers or directors has any legal or beneficial interest in any developer or manager for any time-share property participating in the exchange program;

The names of all officers, directors, and shareholders owning five percent (5%) or more of the outstanding stock of the exchange company;

The terms and conditions of the contractual relationship between the time-share owner and the exchange company;

The procedures whereby that contractual relationship can be changed or terminated, and whether it can be terminated or otherwise affected by action or inaction of the developer or the managing entity or by other factors beyond the control of the time-share owner;

A complete and accurate description of all limitations, restrictions, or priorities employed in the operation of the exchange program, including, but not limited to, limitations on exchanges based on seasonality, unit size, or levels of occupancy, expressed in boldfaced type, and, in the event that such limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied by the program, a clear description of the manner in which they are applied;

The procedures to qualify for and effectuate exchanges, and the manner in which exchanges are arranged by the exchange company;

Whether exchanges are arranged on a space-available basis and whether any guarantees of fulfillment of specific requests for exchanges are made by the program;

Whether and under what circumstances a time-share owner, in dealing with the exchange company, may lose the use and occupancy of his or her time share in any properly applied for exchange without his or her being provided with substitute accommodations by the exchange company;

The fees or range of fees for participation by time-share owners in the program, a statement whether the fees may be altered by the exchange company, and the circumstances under which alterations may be made;

The name and address of the site of each time-share property, accommodation or facility that is participating in the program;

The number of units in each time-share property participating in the program that are available for occupancy and that qualify for participation in the program, expressed within the following numerical groupings: 1-5; 6-10; 11-20; 21-50; and 51 and over; and a statement of the criteria used to determine those units that are available for occupancy;

The number of owners with respect to each time-share property who are eligible to participate in the program expressed within the following numerical groupings: 1-100; 101-249; 250-499; 500-999; and 1,000 and over; and a statement of the criteria used to determine those time-share owners who are currently eligible to participate in the program;

The disposition made by the exchange company of time shares deposited with the program by time-share owners eligible to participate in the program and not used by the exchange company in effecting exchanges;

The following information which shall be independently audited by a certified public accountant or accounting firm in accordance with the standards of the accounting standards board of the American institute of certified public accountants;

The number of time-share owners eligible to participate in the program. The numbers shall disclose the relationship between the exchange company and time-share owners as being either fee paying or gratuitous in nature;

The number of time-share properties, accommodations or facilities eligible to participate in the exchange program categorized by those having a contractual relationship between the developer or the managing entity and the exchange company and those having solely a contractual relationship between the exchange company and owners directly;

The percentage of confirmed exchanges, which shall be the number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company divided by the number of exchanges properly applied for, together with a complete and accurate statement of the criteria used to determine whether an exchange request was properly applied for;

The number of time shares for which the exchange company has an outstanding obligation to provide an exchange to a time-share owner who relinquished a time share during the year in exchange for a time share in any future year; and

The number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company during the year.

A statement in boldfaced type to the effect that the percentage described in subsection (b)(15)(iii) is a summary of the exchange requests entered with the exchange company in the period reported and that the percentage does not indicate a purchaser’s probabilities of being confirmed to any specific choice or range of choices, since availability at individual locations may vary.

In the event an exchange company offers a program directly to the purchaser or time-share owner without any contract between a time-share developer and the exchange company, the exchange company shall deliver to each purchaser or time-share owner the information set forth in subsection (b) above. The requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to any renewal of the contract between a time-share owner and an exchange company, unless there are significant changes in the information required by subsection (b) adversely affecting the interests of the time share owner that have not been delivered in any appropriate form before renewal. An exchange company subject to this subsection for the purposes of delivering the information set forth in subsection (b) is subject to §

34-41-4.02

for the purposes of determining liability.

Each exchange company offering a program to purchasers in this state must include the statement set forth in subsection (b)(16) on all promotional brochures, pamphlets, advertisements, or other materials disseminated by the exchange company which also contain the percentage of confirmed exchanges described in subsection (b)(15)(iii).

As used in this subsection, “multi-location developer” means a developer creating or selling its own time shares in more than one time-share property under a program permitting time-share owners, by reservation or other similar procedure, to occupy time-share units in more than one time-share property. If time-share owners are to be permitted or required to participate in a multi-location program, the public offering statement or a supplement delivered therewith must contain or fully and accurately disclose:

A complete and accurate description of the procedure to qualify for and effectuate use rights in time-share units in the multi-location program;

A complete and accurate description of all limitations, restrictions, or priorities employed in the operation of the multi-location program, including, but not limited to, limitations on reservations, use or entitlement rights based on seasonality, unit size, levels of occupancy or class of owner, expressed boldfaced type, and, in the event that such limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied by the multi-location program, a clear description of the manner in which they are applied;

Whether use is arranged on a space-available basis and whether any guarantees of fulfillment of specific requests for use are made by the multi-location developer;

The name and address of the site of each time-share property included in the multi-location program;

The number of time-share units in each time-share property which are available for occupancy; with respect to each time-share unit, the interest which the multi-location developer has therein (e.g. fee ownership, leasehold, option to purchase), and if less than fee ownership a statement of all relevant terms of the multi-location developer’s interest therein; and with respect to each such time-share unit, whether it may be withdrawn from the multi-location program;

The following information which shall be independently audited by a certified public accountant or accounting firm in accordance with the standards of the accounting standards board of the American institute of certified public accountants:

The number of time-share owners in the multi-location program;

For each time-share property in the multi-location program, the number of properly made requests for use of time-share units in the time-share property; and

For each time-share property, the number of owners who received the right to use a unit in the time-share property as a percentage of the time-share owners who properly requested use in the time-share property.

A statement in boldfaced type to the effect that the percentages described in subsection (e)(6) do not indicate a purchaser’s probabilities of being able to use any time-share unit since availability at individual locations may vary.

A developer shall promptly amend:

The public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by subsection (a) of this section and §

34-41-4.04

, and

The public offering statement or any supplement thereto to report any material change known to him or her in the information required by subsection (b), except that:

Any significant change in information required by subsections (b)(2), (3) and (11) that adversely affect purchasers’ interests shall be reported to purchasers within 30 days after the change occurs. No liability shall be attributed to any person if the change is reported within the 30-day period; and

The information required by subsections (b)(13), (14) and (15) shall be calculated, at the minimum, from the records of the exchange company for each calendar year, and need be available no later than July 1 of the succeeding year.

The public offering statement or any supplement thereto to report any material change in the information required by subsection (e), except that the information required by subsections (e)(4), (5), and (6) shall be calculated, at the minimum, from the records of the multi-location developer for the preceding calendar year, and need be available no later than July 1, of the succeeding year.

Insofar as the developer relies in good faith on information provided by others in making disclosures required by subsection (b), he or she is responsible for a misrepresentation only if he or she has knowledge of its falsity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.04.
Public offering statement — Conversion building.

If a conversion building that includes or is to include one or more time-share units is more than ten (10) years old and the developer or any affiliates of the developer own or control more than fifty percent (50%) of all units in the project, the public offering statement must contain, in addition to the information required by §

34-41-4.03

:

A statement by the developer, based on a report prepared by an independent registered architect or engineer, describing the present condition of all structural components and mechanical and electrical installations material to the use and enjoyment of the time-share units;

A statement by the developer of the expected useful life of each item reported on in subdivision (a)(1) or a statement that no representations are made in that regard; and

A list of any outstanding notices of uncured violations of building code or other municipal regulations, together with the estimated cost of curing those violations.

This section applies only to units in which use as a dwelling or for recreational purposes, or both, is permissible.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.05.
Public offering statement — Time-share securities.

If a time-share is currently registered with the securities and exchange commission of the United States, a developer satisfies all requirements relating to the preparation of a public offering statement of this chapter if he or she delivers to the purchaser (and files with the agency) a copy of the public offering statement filed with the securities and exchange commission. (A time share is not a security under the provisions of chapter 11 of title 7 entitled “Sale of Securities.”)

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.06.
Purchaser’s right to cancel.

A purchaser has the right to cancel the contract until midnight of the fifth (5th) business day (specifically excluding therefrom Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays) following whichever of the following days occurs later:

The execution date; or

The day on which the purchaser received the last of all documents required to be provided to him or her.

This right of cancellation may not be waived by any purchaser or by any other person on behalf of the purchaser. Furthermore, no closing may occur until the cancellation period of the time-share purchaser has expired. Any attempt to obtain a waiver of the cancellation right of the time-share purchaser, or to hold a closing prior to the expiration of the cancellation period, is unlawful and such closing is voidable at the option of the purchaser for a period of one (1) year after the expiration of the cancellation period.

Any notice of cancellation shall be considered given on the date postmarked if mailed, or when transmitted from the place or origin if telegraphed, so long as the notice is actually received by the developer or escrow agent. If given by means of a writing transmitted other than by mail or telegraph, the notice of cancellation shall be considered given at the time of delivery at the place of business of the developer.

In the event of a timely preclosing cancellation, the developer shall honor the right of any purchaser to cancel the contract which granted the time-share purchaser rights in and to the plan. Upon such cancellation, the developer shall refund to the purchaser the total amount of all payments made by the purchaser under the contract, reduced by the proportion of any contract benefits the purchaser has actually received under the contract prior to the effective date of the cancellation. Such refund shall be made within twenty (20) days of demand therefore by the purchaser or within five (5) days after receipt of funds from the purchaser’s cleared check, whichever is later.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 221, § 1.

34-41-4.07.
Resales of time shares.

Except in the case of a sale where delivery of a public offering statement is required, or unless exempt under §

34-41-4.01(b)

, a seller of a time share shall furnish to the purchaser before execution of any contract for the sale, or otherwise before the transfer of title, a copy of the time-share instrument (other than any plats or plans) and a certificate containing:

A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed transfer of any right of first refusal or other restraint on transfer of the time share or any portion thereof;

A statement setting forth the amount of the periodic time-share expense liability and any unpaid time-share expense or special assessment or other sums currently due and payable from the seller;

A statement of any other fees payable by time-share owners; and

A statement of any judgments or other matters that are or may become liens against the time share or the time-share unit and the status of any pending suits that may result in those liens.

A managing entity, within ten (10) days after a request by a time-share owner, shall furnish a certificate containing the information necessary to enable the time-share owner to comply with this section. A time-share owner providing a certificate pursuant to subsection (a) is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the managing entity and included in the certificate, other than for judgment liens against the time share or the time-share unit.

A purchaser is not liable for any unpaid time-share expense liability or fee greater than the amount set forth in a certificate prepared by a managing entity. A time-share owner is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of a managing entity to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser until the certificate has been provided and for five (5) days thereafter or until transfer, whichever first occurs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.08.
Deposits.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation in this state of a time share from a person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to §

34-41-4.02(c)

must be placed in escrow, either in this state or in the state where the time-share project is located, in an account designated solely for that purpose, by a licensed title insurance company, an attorney, a licensed real estate broker, an independent bonded escrow company, or any institution whose accounts are insured until:

Delivered to the developer at the time of any final transfer or conveyance of a time-share interest,

Delivered to the developer because of the purchaser’s default under a contract to purchase the time share,

Refunded to the purchaser,

Delivered to the developer in accordance with §

34-41-5.03(c)(5)

, or

Delivered to the developer of substantially completed units as defined in §

34-41-5.03(a)

, after the expiration of the time for rescission or any later date specified in the contract to purchase the time share.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 86.

34-41-4.09.
Liens.

In the case of a sale of a time share where delivery of a public offering statement is required pursuant to §

34-41-4.02(c)

, a seller shall, before transferring a time share, record or furnish to the purchaser releases of all liens affecting that time share which the purchaser does not expressly agree to take subject to or assume, or shall provide a surety bond or substantiate collateral for or insurance against the lien as provided for liens on real estate in this title.

If a lien other than a deed of trust or mortgage becomes effective against more than one time-share estate, any time-share owner is entitled to a release of his or her time-share estate from the lien upon payment of his or her proportionate liability for the lien in accordance with time-share expense liability unless he or she or his or her predecessor in interest agreed otherwise with the lienor. After payment, the managing entity may not assess or have a lien against that time-share estate for any portion of the time-share expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

If a lien is to be foreclosed or enforced against all time shares in a time-share property, service of notice pursuant to §

34-27-4

upon the managing entity, if any, constitutes service thereof upon all the time-share owners for the purposes of foreclosure or enforcement. The lienholder shall also forward promptly, by certified or registered mail, a copy thereof to each time-share owner at his or her last known address. The notice does not suffice for the entry of a deficiency or other personal judgment against any time-share owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.10.
Conversion building.

A developer of a time-share property which includes all or any part of a conversion building, and any person in the business of selling real estate for his or her own account who intends to offer time shares in such a property, shall give each of the residential tenants and any residential subtenant in possession of the proposed time-share units notice of the conversion no later than one hundred twenty (120) days before the developer will require the tenants and any subtenant in possession to vacate. Rents shall not be increased during the notice period. The notice must set forth generally the rights of tenants and subtenants under this section and be hand-delivered to the unit or mailed to the tenant and subtenant at the address of the unit or any other mailing address provided by a tenant. No tenant or subtenant may be required by the developer to vacate upon less than one hundred twenty (120) days’ notice, except by reason of nonpayment of rent, waste, or conduct that disturbs other tenants’ peaceful enjoyment of the premises, and the terms of the tenancy may not be altered during that period. Failure to give notice as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession.

For sixty (60) days after delivery or mailing of the notice described in subsection (a), the person required to give the notice shall offer to convey each time-share unit or time-share proposed unit occupied for residential use to the tenant who leases that unit. Tenants shall have the right to cancel their lease and receive no penalties for the cancellation as long as all obligations of the lease have been met. If a tenant fails to purchase the unit during the sixty (60) day period, the offeror may not offer to dispose of an interest in that unit during the following one hundred eighty (180) days at a price or on terms more favorable to the offeree than the price or terms offered to the tenant. This subsection does not apply to any unit in a conversion building if that unit will be restricted exclusively to nonresidential use of the boundaries of the converted unit do not substantially conform to the dimension of the residential unit for conversion.

If a seller, in violation of subsection (b), conveys a time-share unit to a purchaser for value who has no knowledge of the violation, recordation of the deed conveying the unit extinguishes any right a tenant may have under subsection (b) to purchase that unit if the deed states that the seller has complied with subsection (b), but does not affect the right of a tenant to recover damages from the seller for a violation of subsection (b).

If a notice of conversion specifies a date by which a unit must be vacated and otherwise complies with the provisions of chapter 18 of this title, the notice also constitutes a notice to vacate specified by that statute.

Notwithstanding the notice provisions of subsection (a) any tenant who has continuously resided in the unit for ten (10) years or more or any tenant who has attained the age of sixty-two (62) shall be given one year notice. Rents shall not be increased during the notice period. A tenant as described in this subsection shall have one hundred eighty (180) days within which to purchase the unit as provided for in subsection (b) and the remaining provisions of that subsection shall apply.

The owner or developer shall pay reasonable moving expenses and costs, to any tenant who has attained the age of sixty-two (62), within a fifty (50) mile radius.

Nothing in this section permits termination of a lease by a developer in violation of its terms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.11.
Express warranties of quality.

Express warranties made by any seller to a purchaser of a time share, if relied upon by the purchaser, are created as follows:

Any affirmation of fact or promise which relates to the time share, the time-share unit, rights appurtenant to either, area improvements that would directly benefit the time share, or the right to use or have the benefit of facilities not located on the time-share unit, creates an express warranty that the time share, the time-share unit, and related rights and uses will conform to the affirmation or promise;

Any model or description of the physical characteristics of the time-share property, including plans and specifications of or for improvements, creates an express warranty that the property will substantially conform to the model or description;

Any description of the quantity or extent of the real estate constituting the time-share property, including plats or surveys, creates an express warranty that the property will conform to the description, subject to customary tolerances; and

A provision that a purchaser may put a time-share unit only to a specified use is an express warranty that the specified use is lawful.

Neither formal words, such as “warranty” or “guarantee,” nor a specific intention to make a warranty, is necessary to create an express warranty of quality, but a statement purporting to be merely an opinion or commendation of the time share, the time-share unit, or the value of either does not create a warranty.

Any transfer of a time share transfers to the purchaser all express warranties of quality made by previous sellers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.12.
Implied warranties of quality.

A developer and any person in the business of selling real estate for his or her own account warrants that a time-share unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the transfer or of the delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

A developer and any person in the business of selling real estate for his or her own account impliedly warrants that a time-share unit and any other real property the time-share owners have a right to use in conjunction therewith are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by him or her, or made by any person before transfer, will be:

Free from defective materials; and

Constructed in accordance with applicable law, according to sound engineering and construction standards, and in a workerlike manner.

In addition, a developer warrants to a purchaser of a time share that an existing use of the time-share unit, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the earlier of the time of transfer or of the delivery of possession.

Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified as provided in §

34-41-4.13

.

For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a developer are made or contracted for by the developer.

Any transfer of a time share transfers to the purchaser all of any developer’s implied warranties of quality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.13.
Exclusion or modification of implied warranties of quality.

Except as limited by subsection (b) with respect to a purchaser of a time share in a time-share unit that may be used as a dwelling or for recreational purposes, implied warranties of quality:

May be excluded or modified by agreement of the parties; and

Are excluded by expression of disclaimer, such as “as is”, “with all faults”, or other language that in common understanding calls the purchaser’s attention to the exclusion of warranties.

With respect to a purchaser of a time share in a time-share unit that may be used as a dwelling or for recreational purposes, no general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality is effective, but a developer may disclaim liability in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a specified defect or specified failure to comply with applicable law if the existence of the defect or failure entered into and became a part of the basis of the bargain.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.14.
Statute of limitation for warranties.

A judicial proceeding for breach of any obligation arising under §

34-41-4.11

or

34-41-4.12

must be commenced within ten (10) years after the cause of action accrues, but the parties may agree to reduce the period of limitation to not less than five (5) years. With respect to a time-share unit that may be used as a dwelling or for recreational purposes, an agreement to reduce the period of limitation must be evidenced by a separate instrument executed by the purchaser.

Subject to subsection (c), a cause of action for breach of warranty of quality, regardless of the purchaser’s lack of knowledge of the breach accrues, unless extended by agreement:

As to a unit, at the time of the first transfer of a time share therein by the seller to a bona fide purchaser; and

As to other improvements, at the time each is completed.

If a warranty of quality explicitly extends to future performance or duration of any improvement or component of the property, the cause of action accrues at the time the breach is discovered or at the end of the period for which the warranty explicitly extends, whichever is earlier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.15.
Effect of violations on rights of action.

If a developer or any other person subject to this chapter fails to comply with any provision of this chapter or of the time-share instrument, any person or class of persons adversely affected by the failure to comply has a claim for appropriate relief.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.16.
Labeling of promotional material.

If any improvement in the time-share property is not required to be built, no promotional material may be displayed or delivered to prospective purchasers which describes or portrays that improvement unless the description or portrayal of the improvement is conspicuously labeled or identified as “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.17.
Developer’s obligation to complete.

The developer shall complete all promised improvements described in the time-share instrument and promotional materials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-4.18.
Substantial completion of units.

In the case of a sale of a time share interest unit where delivery of a public offering statement is required, a contract of sale may be executed, but no interest in that unit may be conveyed or finally transferred until the unit is substantially completed, as evidenced by a recorded certificate of substantial completion executed by an independent registered architect or engineer, or by issuance of a certificate of occupancy authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.